Vermont, session 2025-2026, H400.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 8504 is amended to read:
§ 8504. APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION
* * *
(k) Limitations on appeals. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section:
VT LEG #380422 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.400
2025 Page 2 of 2
* * *
(4) it shall be the goal of the Environmental Division to shall hear a case
regarding an appeal of a permit for housing within 30 days following the
appeal being filed and issue a decision on a the case regarding an appeal of an
appropriate municipal panel decision under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117 within 90
120 days following the close of the hearing.
* * *
Sec. 2. COURT POSITIONS; APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In fiscal year 2026, in the Environmental Division of the Superior
Court, the following full-time permanent positions are created:
(1) one Superior Court Judge; and
(2) one law clerk.
(b) In fiscal year 2026, $300,000.00 is appropriated to the Judiciary for the
purpose of hiring the positions created in subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380422 v.1